Washington statutes.
RCW 37.12.150

Retrocession of federal jurisdiction over lands excluded from Olympic National Park.

The state of Washington hereby accepts retrocession from the United States of the jurisdiction which the United States acquired over those lands excluded from the boundaries of the Olympic National Park by 16 U.S.C. Sec. 251e. The lands restored to the Quileute Indian Reservation by Public Law 94-578 shall be subject to the same Washington state and tribal jurisdiction as all other lands within the Quileute Reservation.

[ 1988 c 108 s 5.]